Utah statutes.
57-12-6.   Buildings, structures or other improvements.
(1) Where any interest in real property is acquired, an equal interest in all
buildings, structures, or other improvements located upon the real property so
acquired and which is required to be removed from the real property or which
is determined to be adversely affected by the use to which the real property
will be put, shall be acquired.
(2)  For the purpose of determining the just compensation to be paid for any
building, structure, or other improvement required to be acquired under
Subsection (1), the building, structure, or other improvement shall be deemed
to be a part of the real property to be acquired, notwithstanding the right or
obligation of a tenant, as against the owner of any other interest in the real
property, to remove the building, structure, or improvement at the expiration
of his term; and the fair market value which the building, structure, or
improvement contributes to the fair market value of the property to be
acquired, or the fair market value of the building, structure, or improvement
for removal from the real property, whichever is the greater, shall be paid to
the tenant therefor.
(3)  Payment for the buildings, structures, or improvements as set forth in
Subsection (2) shall not result in duplication of any payments otherwise
authorized by state law. No payment shall be made unless the owner of the land
involved disclaims all interest in the improvements of the tenant. In
consideration for any payment, the tenant shall assign, transfer, and release
all his right, title and interest in and to the improvements. Nothing with
regard to this acquisition of buildings, structures, or other improvements
shall be construed to deprive the tenants of any rights to reject payment and
to obtain payment for these property interests in accordance with other laws
of this state.
